Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6034.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6b. (1) The Tri-Share child care workplace benefit program is established in the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to establish an employer child care benefit system that leverages employers' and this state's support to assist with the child care costs of the employees of participating employers. The department shall establish eligibility criteria for employees and employers for participation in the program. Subject to sufficient appropriations, the department shall provide for the administration and management of the contributions for the payments to child care providers from the participating employers, the participating employers' employees, and this state's contribution for eligible employees. An employer may participate in the program if the employer covers at least 1/3 of the costs of an employee's child care costs. Subject to sufficient appropriations, the department shall provide 1/3 of the costs of an eligible employee's child care costs. Notwithstanding this subsection, an employer may elect to contribute more than 1/3 of the costs of an employee's child care costs. An employee may be eligible for the program if the employee is not receiving a child care subsidy from this state funded by the child development and care program. The department shall establish Care-Share for employers participating in the program with employees who do not meet the eligibility criteria established by the department and who are not receiving a child care subsidy from this state funded by the child development and care program. The department administers Care-Share but does not provide funding for the employee's child care expenses. (2) The Tri-Share child care workplace benefit fund is created in the state treasury. (3) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (4) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year must remain in the fund and must not lapse to the general fund. (5) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (6) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall expend money from the fund, on appropriation, to do both of the following: (a) Administer the program, including Care-Share established under subsection (1). The department may develop program and administration options to attract participation of employers in this state. (b) Award funds to support regional recruitment activities and statewide services. The department must establish benchmarks for regional recruitment efforts and statewide support services. The department may provide advances on a schedule as determined by the department for timely provider payments. On conclusion of the program or termination of any grant agreement, any unspent award funds held by any program partner must be spent down toward this state's share of child care payments or returned to this state at the discretion of the department. (7) An entity receiving funds must be a nonprofit, a limited liability company, a C-corporation, an S-corporation, an intermediate school district, or a sole proprietor. Funds may be used to enroll an individual living outside this state in the program if the individual has a parent or guardian who is employed in this state. A child care provider providing care for an individual described under this subsection must be located and licensed in this state. (8) If appropriations are insufficient to cover this state's 1/3 contribution, an employer may participate in the program by electing the Care-Share option. (9) As used in this section: (a) "Fund" means the Tri-Share child care workplace benefit fund established in subsection (2). (b) "Program" means the Tri-Share child care workplace benefit program created in subsection (1).